North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-04 Supervision of Issue and Sale of Securities

10-04-01.
Title.

This chapter shall be known as the Securities Act of 1951.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0401.

Cross-References.

North Dakota mill and elevator association exempt from Securities Act in performing its marketing functions, see N.D.C.C. § 54-18-04.1.

Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities, see N.D.C.C. ch. 41-08.

10-04-02.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Agent” means an individual, other than a broker-dealer, who represents a broker-dealer or an issuer or is self-employed in effecting or attempting to effect purchases or sales of securities. However, a partner, officer, or director of a broker-dealer, or an individual having a similar status or performing similar functions is an agent only if the individual otherwise comes within the term.

“Bank” means:

A bank institution organized under the laws of the United States;

A member bank of the federal reserve system;

Any other banking institution, whether or not incorporated, doing business under the laws of a state or of the United States, a substantial portion of the business of which consists of receiving deposits or exercising fiduciary powers similar to those permitted to be exercised by national banks under the authority of the comptroller of the currency pursuant to section 1 of Public Law 87-722, and which is supervised and examined by a state or federal agency having supervision over banks, and which is not operated for the purpose of evading this chapter; and

A receiver, conservator, or other liquidating agent of any institution or firm included in subdivision a, b, or c.

“Broker-dealer” means a person engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities issued by another person or by such person for the account of others or for the person’s own account. The term does not include:

An agent;

A bank or savings institution if its activities as a broker-dealer are limited to those specified in subsections 3(a)(4)(B)(i) through (vi), (viii) through (x), and (xi) if limited to unsolicited transactions; 3(a)(5)(B) and 3(a)(5)(C) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or a bank that satisfies the conditions described in subsection 3(a)(4)(E) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; or

An issuer, including an officer, director, employee, or trustee of, or member or manager of, or partner in, or a general partner of, an issuer, that sells, offers for sale, or does any act in furtherance of the sale of a security that represents an economic interest in that issuer, provided no commission, fee, or other similar remuneration is paid to or received by the issuer for the sale.

“Commissioner” means the securities commissioner of this state.

“Department” means the state securities department.

“Depository institution” means:

A bank; or

A savings institution, trust company, credit union, or similar institution that is organized or chartered under the laws of a state or of the United States, authorized to receive deposits, and supervised and examined by an official or agency of a state or the United States if its deposits or share accounts are insured to the maximum amount authorized by statute by the federal deposit insurance corporation, the national credit union shares insurance fund, or a successor authorized by federal law. The term does not include:

An insurance company or other organization primarily engaged in the business of insurance;

A Morris plan bank; or

An industrial loan company.

“Federal covered adviser” means a person who is registered under section 203 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940.

“Federal covered security” means a security that is, or upon completion of a transaction will be, a covered security pursuant to section 18(b) of the Securities Act of 1933 or rules or regulations adopted under that Act.

“Institutional investor” means any of the following, whether acting for itself or for others in a fiduciary capacity:

A depository institution or international banking institution;

An insurance company;

A separate account of an insurance company;

An investment company as defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940;

A broker-dealer under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;

An employee pension, profit-sharing, or benefit plan if the plan has total assets in excess of ten million dollars or its investment decisions are made by a named fiduciary, as defined in the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, that is a broker-dealer registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, an investment adviser registered or exempt from registration under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, an investment adviser registered under this Act, a depository institution, or an insurance company;

A plan established and maintained by a state, a political subdivision of a state, or an agency or instrumentality of a state or a political subdivision of a state for the benefit of its employees, if the plan has total assets in excess of ten million dollars or its investment decisions are made by a duly designated public official or by a named fiduciary, as defined in the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, that is a broker-dealer registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, an investment adviser registered or exempt from registration under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, an investment adviser registered under this chapter, a depository institution, or an insurance company;

A trust, if it has total assets in excess of ten million dollars, its trustee is a depository institution, and its participants are exclusively plans of the types identified in subdivision f or g, regardless of the size of their assets, except a trust that includes as participants self-directed individual retirement accounts or similar self-directed plans;

An organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, corporation, Massachusetts trust or similar business trust, limited liability company, or partnership, not formed for specific purpose of acquiring the securities offered, with total assets in excess of ten million dollars;

A small business investment company licensed by the small business administration under section 301(c) of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958 with total assets in excess of ten million dollars;

A private business development company as defined in section 202(a)(22) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 with total assets in excess of ten million dollars;

A federal covered investment adviser acting for its own account;

A qualified institutional buyer as defined in rule 144A(a)(1), other than rule 144A(a)(1)(i)(H), adopted under the Securities Act of 1933;

A major United States institutional investor as defined in rule 15a-6(b)(4)(i) adopted under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; or

Any other person, other than an individual, of institutional character with total assets in excess of ten million dollars not organized for the specific purpose of evading this chapter.

“Investment adviser” means any person who, for compensation, engages in the business of advising others, either directly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or as to the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities, or who, for compensation and as a part of a regular business, issues or promulgates analyses or reports concerning securities. The term includes financial planners and other persons who, as an integral component of other financially related services, provide the foregoing investment advisory services to others for compensation and as part of a business or who hold themselves out as providing the foregoing investment advisory services to others for compensation. The term does not include:

An investment adviser representative.

A bank, savings institution, or trust company.

A lawyer, accountant, engineer, or teacher whose performance of these services is solely incidental to the practice of the person’s profession.

A broker-dealer or its agent whose performance of these services is solely incidental to the conduct of business as a broker-dealer and who receives no special compensation for them.

A publisher of any bona fide newspaper, news column, newsletter, news magazine, or business or financial publication or service, whether communicated in hard copy form, or by electronic means, or otherwise, that does not consist of the rendering of advice on the basis of the specific investment situation of each client.

A federal covered adviser.

A person who is excluded by the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 from the definition of investment adviser.

Such other persons not within the intent of this subsection as the commissioner may by rule or order designate.

“Investment adviser representative” means an individual employed by or associated with an investment adviser or federal covered adviser and who:

Makes any recommendations or otherwise renders advice regarding securities directly to advisory clients;

Manages the accounts or portfolios of clients;

Determines which recommendations or advice regarding securities should be given;

Provides investment advice or holds out as providing investment advice, receives compensation to solicit, offer, or negotiate for the sale of or sells investment advisory services; or

Immediately supervises employees in the performance of any of the foregoing.

The term does not include an individual who:

Is employed by or associated with a federal covered investment adviser, unless the individual has a “place of business” in this state, as that term is defined by the securities and exchange commission pursuant to section 203A of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940.

Is an agent whose performance of investment advice is solely incidental to the individual acting as an agent and who does not receive special compensation for investment advisory services.

Performs only clerical or ministerial acts.

“Issuer” means every person who issues or proposes to issue any security, except that:

With respect to certificates of deposit, voting-trust certificates, collateral trust certificates, or shares in an unincorporated investment trust, issuer means the person or persons performing the acts and assuming the duties of depositor or manager pursuant to the provisions of the trust or other agreement or instrument under which such securities are issued.

With respect to equipment trust certificates or like securities serving the same purpose, issuer means the person by whom the equipment or property is or will be used or to which the property or equipment is or will be leased or conditionally sold or that is otherwise contractually responsible for assuring payment of the certificate.

With respect to fractional interests in an oil, gas, or other mineral lease or in payments out of production under a lease, right, or royalty, issuer means the owner of any such right or any interest in such lease or in payments out of production under a lease, right, or royalty, whether whole or fractional, that creates fractional interests for the purpose of sale.

With respect to a fractional or pooled interest in a viatical settlement contract, issuer means the person who creates, for the purpose of sale, the fractional or pooled interest. The issuer of a viatical settlement contract that is not fractionalized or pooled means the person effecting the transactions with the investors in such contracts.

“Offer for sale” or “offer to sell” means every attempt or offer to dispose of, or solicitation of an order or offer to buy, a security or interest in a security for value.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, joint venture, trust, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Place of business” of a broker-dealer, an investment adviser, or a federal covered investment adviser means:

An office at which the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser regularly provides brokerage or investment advice or solicits, meets with, or otherwise communicates with customers or clients; or

Any other location that is held out to the general public as a location at which the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser provides brokerage or investment advice or solicits, meets with, or otherwise communicates with customers or clients.

“Principal place of business” of a broker-dealer or an investment adviser means the executive office of the broker-dealer or investment adviser from which the officers, partners, or managers of the broker-dealer or investment adviser direct, control, and coordinate the activities of the broker-dealer or investment adviser.

“Record” except in phrases “of record”, “official record”, and “public record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Sale” or “sell” means every sale, contract to sell, or disposition of a security or interest in a security for value, and every contract to make any such sale or disposition. The term includes:

Any security given or delivered with, or as a bonus on account of any purchase of securities or any other thing, must be conclusively presumed to constitute a part of the subject of such purchase and to have been sold for value.

A sale or offer of a warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to another security of the same or another issuer and a sale or offer of a security that gives the holder a present or future right or privilege to convert the security into another security of the same or another issuer, including an offer of the other security.

“Security” means any note; stock; treasury stock; bond; debenture; evidence of indebtedness; certificate of interest or participation in any profit-sharing agreement; certificate of interest or participation in an oil, gas, or mining title or lease or in payments out of production under such a title or lease; collateral trust certificate; preorganization certificate or subscription; transferable share; investment contract; viatical or life settlement contract or a fractionalized or pooled interest therein; program, contract, or other arrangement in which persons invest in a common enterprise the returns of which depend to any extent upon inducing other persons to participate or invest in the enterprise; investment of money or money’s worth including goods furnished or services performed in the risk capital of a venture with the expectation of profit or some other form of benefit to the investor when the investor has no direct control over the investment or policy decisions of the venture; voting-trust certificate; certificate of deposit for a security; foreign currency commodity contract, as used in chapter 51-23; or beneficial interest in title to property, profits, or earnings; or, in general, any interest or instrument commonly known as a “security”; or any certificate of interest or participation in, temporary or interim certificate for, receipt for, guarantee of, or warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase, any of the foregoing.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Viatical or life settlement contract” means an agreement for the purchase, sale, assignment, transfer, devise, or bequest of any portion of the death benefit or ownership of a life insurance policy or certificate, for consideration that is less than the expected death benefit of the life insurance policy or certificate. “Viatical or life settlement contract” does not include:

The assignment, transfer, sale, devise, or bequest of a death benefit, life insurance policy, or certificate of insurance by the owner to the provider pursuant to chapter 26.1-33.4;

The assignment of a life insurance policy to a bank or depository institution; or

The exercise of accelerated benefits pursuant to the terms of a life insurance policy issued in accordance with the insurance laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0402; S.L. 1973, ch. 81, § 2; 1977, ch. 83, § 1; 1981, ch. 132, § 1; 1983, ch. 128, § 1; 1985, ch. 140, § 1; 1987, ch. 135, § 1; 1989, ch. 122, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1999, ch. 92, § 1; 1999, ch. 93, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 271, § 1; 2003, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 97, § 1; 2007, ch. 266, § 1; 2009, ch. 107, §
1; 2009, ch. 254, § 1; 2021, ch. 86, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 1 of P.L. 87-722 referenced above is compiled at 12 USCS § 92a.

The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 referenced above is compiled at 15 USCS § 78a et seq.

Section 203 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 referenced above is compiled at 15 USCS § 80b-3.

The Securities Act of 1933 referenced above is compiled at 15 USCS § 77a et seq.

The Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 referenced above is compiled at 29 USCS § 1001, et seq.

The Investment Company Act of 1940 referenced above is compiled at 15 USCS § 80a-1, et seq.

Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code referenced above is compiled at 26 USCS § 501(c)(3).

Section 301 of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958 referenced above is compiled at
15 USCS § 681.

Cross-References.

Definitions in investment securities chapter of Uniform Commercial Code, see N.D.C.C. § 41-08-02.

10-04-03.
Administration of chapter.

The state securities department is under the supervision of a chief officer designated as the securities commissioner. The securities commissioner must be appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate and shall hold office for a term of four years, beginning on the first day of July following a national presidential election and continuing until a successor has been appointed, confirmed by the senate, and has qualified, unless removed as herein provided. If the senate is not in session, the governor may make an interim appointment, and the interim appointee may hold office until the senate confirms or rejects the appointment. The commissioner may not own or control any security required to be registered under this chapter, or any security which is exempt based on the approval of the securities department. The commissioner may not be an officer, director, or employee of any broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative required to be registered under this chapter, or of a federal covered adviser required to be notice-filed under this chapter. The governor may remove from office any commissioner who fails to discharge faithfully the duties of office or who becomes disqualified under the provisions of this section.

The commissioner shall have authority to administer oaths in, and to prescribe forms for, all matters arising under this chapter. The commissioner may from time to time make, amend, and rescind such rules, forms, and orders as are necessary under this chapter, including rules and forms governing registration statements, applications and reports, and defining any terms, whether or not used in this chapter, if the definitions are consistent with this chapter. The commissioner shall cooperate with the administrators of the securities laws of other states and of the United States with a view toward achieving maximum uniformity in the interpretation of like provisions of the laws administered by them and in the forms which are required to be filed under such law.

In addition to their regular compensation, the commissioner and the commissioner’s employees shall be paid travel expenses necessary and actually incurred in the performance of their duties.

A special fund is established in the state treasury and designated as the investor education and technology fund. The commissioner may deposit the following moneys into the investor education and technology fund:

Payments for tuition or other costs associated with educational services or materials provided by the department.

Grants or donations for the purpose of investor education received by the commissioner from any public or private source.

Civil penalties assessed by the commissioner under the Securities Act of 1951, if the commissioner finds that:

The violations or alleged violations underlying the assessment of civil penalties involve repeat violations, involve numerous investors, or appear to have been perpetrated on a systematic basis; and

The violations or alleged violations underlying the assessment of civil penalties could have been prevented or significantly curtailed had the individual investors involved in the matter been more knowledgeable about financial concepts in general, or about any specific laws, practices, or procedures relating to the securities industry.

A special fund is established in the state treasury and designated as the securities department special fund. All fees, civil penalties, or other moneys collected under this chapter must be deposited in the securities department special fund, except funds permitted to be deposited into the investor education and technology fund under subsection 4 or civil penalties collected from enforcement actions for the purpose of distribution to aggrieved investors, which may be deposited in the investor restitution fund. Funds in the investor restitution fund are appropriated to the securities commissioner on a continuing basis for distribution to aggrieved investors.

The moneys deposited in the securities department special fund are reserved for use by the securities department to defray the expenses of the department in the discharge of administrative and regulatory powers and duties of the department as prescribed by law. Deposits under this subdivision are subject to the applicable laws relating to the appropriations of state funds and to the deposit and expenditure of state moneys. The securities commissioner is responsible for the proper expenditure of these moneys as provided by law.

The office of management and budget shall transfer any balance in the securities department special fund in excess of the amounts necessary for department expenditures pursuant to the department’s biennial appropriation to the general fund.

The commissioner may honor requests from interested persons for the issuance of a statement or opinion concerning the applicability of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter to any transaction or proposed transaction which may be subject to this chapter. Any such request must be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of one hundred fifty dollars.

It is the prime duty of the commissioner to administer the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner shall receive a salary within the amount appropriated for salaries by the legislative assembly. The commissioner shall use a seal with the words “securities commissioner, North Dakota” and such design as the commissioner may prescribe engraved thereon by which seal the commissioner may authenticate documents used in the administration of this chapter. The commissioner may employ such employees as are necessary for the administration of this chapter. In the absence or disability of the commissioner, the deputy or designee of the commissioner may administer the provisions of this chapter as acting commissioner.

The commissioner shall maintain and administer the investor education and technology fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated to provide education services to the public relating to any of the financial services industries, including the securities industry, and to provide for the technology needs of the department, including the purchase or rental of equipment or software, servicing of the equipment or software, and training the commissioner’s staff in the use of the equipment or software.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0403; S.L. 1959, ch. 110, § 1; 1961, ch. 116, § 1; 1961, ch. 117, § 1; 1979, ch. 151, § 1; 1981, ch. 535, § 2; 1983, ch. 128, § 2; 1985, ch. 140, § 2; 1989, ch. 122, § 2; 1989, ch. 123, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 101, § 1; 1999, ch. 92, § 2; 2003, ch. 82, § 2; 2005, ch. 97, § 2; 2019, ch. 36, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 15, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Who, other than officers and directors, is civilly liable under State Securities Acts for purchase price of unauthorized corporate securities, 59 A.L.R.2d 1030.

10-04-04.
Registration of securities.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, or offer for sale, any security in this state unless it is registered under this chapter or the security or transaction is exempt under section 10-04-05 or 10-04-06 or it is a federal covered security.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0404; S.L. 1961, ch. 117, § 2; 1999, ch. 92, § 3; 2001, ch. 109, § 1.

10-04-04.1.
Agent or investment adviser representative records — Exempt record.

The home address of an agent or investment adviser representative received by the commissioner is an exempt record as defined in section 44-04-17.1.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 217, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

10-04-05.
Exempt securities.

Sections 10-04-04, 10-04-07.1, 10-04-07.2, 10-04-08, and 10-04-08.4 do not apply to any of the following securities:

A security, including a revenue obligation or a separate security as defined in rule 131 adopted under the Securities Act of 1933, issued, insured, or guaranteed by the United States, by a state, by a political subdivision of a state, by a public authority, agency, or instrumentality of one or more states, by a political subdivision of one or more states, or by a person controlled or supervised by and acting as an instrumentality of the United States under authority granted by the Congress, or a certificate of deposit for any of the foregoing, except that this exemption does not include a municipal security with respect to the offer or sale in this state if the security is payable solely from revenues to be received from a nongovernmental industrial or commercial enterprise, unless such payments are made or unconditionally guaranteed by a person whose securities are exempt from registration or the issuer first files a notice in a record specifying the terms of the proposed offer or sale and pays a nonrefundable filing fee of one hundred dollars.

Securities issued by and representing or that will represent an interest in or a direct obligation of, or be guaranteed by a banking institution organized under the laws of the United States, a member bank of the federal reserve system, or a depository institution a substantial portion of the business of which consists or will consist of receiving deposits or share accounts that are insured to the maximum amount authorized by statute by the federal deposit insurance corporation, the national credit union share insurance fund, or a successor authorized by federal law or exercising fiduciary powers that are similar to those permitted for national banks under the authority of the comptroller of currency pursuant to section 1 of Public Law 87-722 or issued or guaranteed as to both principal and interest by an international bank of which the United States is a member.

Securities issued by a building and loan association subject to supervision by an agency of the state of North Dakota, or policy contracts, including variable annuity contracts, of an insurance company subject to supervision by an agency of the state of North Dakota.

Securities issued or guaranteed by a railroad, other common carrier, public utility, or public utility holding company that is regulated in respect to its rates and charges by the United States or a state, regulated in respect to the issuance or guarantee of the security by the United States, a state, Canada, or a Canadian province or territory, or a public utility holding company registered under the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935 or a subsidiary of such a registered holding company within the meaning of that Act.

Any security issued by any person organized and operated not for private profit but exclusively for religious, educational, benevolent, fraternal, charitable, social, or reformatory purposes; provided that prior to any offer of such security each person must meet the following conditions:

Apply for and obtain the written approval of the commissioner.

File an application, offering disclosure document, and pay a nonrefundable filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars, which document and fee must accompany the application.

File a notice identifying the basis of its qualification under this exemption with such additional information as the commissioner may require.

Provide a copy of the offering disclosure document to each person to whom an offer to sell or sale is made.

Any note, draft, bill of exchange, or bankers’ acceptance which arises out of a current transaction or the proceeds of which have been or are to be used for current transactions, is not the subject of a public offering, is prime quality negotiable commercial paper which has at the time of issuance a definite maturity of not exceeding nine months, is payable in cash only, and is not convertible into and does not carry an option or right to receive payment or any bonus in any other security.

Securities, other than common stock, providing for a fixed return, which have been outstanding and in the hands of the public for not less than five years and upon which no default has occurred during the five years next preceding the date of sale.

Securities, including patronage dividends or refunds, issued by any cooperative organized under the statutes of this state.

An equipment trust certificate with respect to equipment leased or conditionally sold to, a person, if any security issued by the person would be exempt under this section or would be a federal covered security under section 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933.

Any bond, note, or other evidence of debt issued by a holding corporation or limited liability company and secured by collateral consisting of any of the securities described in subsections 4 and 9, if the collateral securities equal in fair value at least one hundred twenty-five percent of the par value of the bonds, notes, or other evidences of debts secured thereby.

The execution of orders for purchase of securities by a registered broker-dealer provided such broker-dealer acts as agent for the purchaser, has made no solicitation of the order to purchase such securities, has no direct material interest in the sale or distribution of the securities ordered, receives no commission, profit, or other compensation other than the commissions involved in the purchase and sale of the securities and delivery to the purchaser of written confirmation of the order which clearly itemizes the commissions paid to the registered broker-dealer. Clear and complete records of all transactions exempted under this subsection shall be maintained by the registered broker-dealer.

Any security issued, insured, or guaranteed by a foreign government with which the United States currently maintains diplomatic relations, or any of its political subdivisions, if the security is recognized as a valid obligation by the issuer, insurer, or guarantor.

A federal covered security specified in section 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933 or by rule adopted under that provision or a security listed or approved for listing on:

The New York stock exchange;

The American stock exchange;

The national association of securities dealers automated quotation national market system;

Tier I of the Philadelphia stock exchange, incorporated;

Tier I of the Pacific exchange, incorporated;

Chicago board options exchange, incorporated; or

Any other stock exchange or automated quotation system which the securities and exchange commission approves by rule.

A put or call option contract; a warrant; a subscription right on or with respect to such securities; or an option or similar derivative security on a security or an index of securities or foreign currencies issued by a clearing agency registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and listed or designated for trading on a national securities exchange, a facility of a national securities exchange, or a facility of a national securities association registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or an offer or sale, of the underlying security in connection with the offer, sale, or exercise of an option or other security that was exempt when the option or other security was written or issued; or an option or a derivative security designated by the securities and exchange commission under section 9(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.

Securities issued by North Dakota united dues credit trust to members of North Dakota united.

A security of a foreign issuer that is a margin security defined in regulations or rules adopted by the board of governors of the federal reserve system.

The approval is effective for a period of one year from the date of approval. At least thirty days prior to the expiration date, there must be filed an application, offering disclosure document, and a nonrefundable fee of one hundred dollars for the renewal of the filing for additional periods of one year.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0405; S.L. 1959, ch. 110, § 2; 1961, ch. 117, § 3; 1963, ch. 102, § 1; 1965, ch. 95, § 1; 1973, ch. 81, § 3; 1979, ch. 151, § 2; 1981, ch. 132, § 2; 1983, ch. 128, § 3; 1985, ch. 140, § 3; 1985, ch. 150, § 11; 1987, ch. 141, § 26; 1989, ch. 123, § 3; 1991, ch. 96, § 1; 1991, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 86, § 1; 1995, ch. 107, § 3; 1999, ch. 92, § 4; 2001, ch. 88, § 67; 2003, ch. 82, § 3; 2005, ch. 97, § 3; 2005, ch. 151, § 2; 2017, ch. 129, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 86, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

The Securities Act of 1933 referenced above is compiled at 15 USCS § 77a et seq.

Section 1 of P.L. 87-722 referenced above is compiled at 12 USCS § 92a.

The Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935 referenced above was formerly compiled at 15 USCS § 79, et seq. It was repealed by Act Aug. 8, 2005, P.L. 109-58, Title XII, Subtitle F, § 1263, 119 Stat. 974.

The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 referenced above is compiled at 15 USCS § 78a et seq.

Cross-References.

Membership certificates of electric cooperatives exempt, see N.D.C.C. § 10-13-08.